Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.210

Enforcement.

The director may refer such evidence as may be available to him or her concerning violations of this chapter or of any rule or regulation adopted hereunder to the attorney general or the prosecuting attorney of the county wherein the alleged violation arose, who may, in their discretion, with or without such a reference, in addition to any other action they might commence, bring an action in the name of the state against any person to restrain and prevent the doing of any act or practice prohibited by this chapter: PROVIDED, That this chapter shall be considered in conjunction with chapters 9.04 and 19.86 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, and the powers and duties of the attorney general and the prosecuting attorney as they may appear in the aforementioned chapters, shall apply against all persons subject to this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 537; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 21.]